District of Columbia statutes.
15-903

Determining money of the claim.

(a)

The money in which the parties to a transaction have agreed that payment is to be made, is the proper money of the claim for payment.

(b)

If the parties to a transaction have not otherwise agreed, the proper money of the claim, as in each case may be appropriate, is the money:

(1)

Regularly used between the parties as a matter of usage or course of dealing;

(2)

Used at the time of a transaction in international trade, by trade usage or common practice, for valuing or settling transactions in the particular commodity or service involved; or

(3)

In which the loss was ultimately felt or will be incurred by the party claimant.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791
1981 Ed., § 15-903.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.